Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.901

Short title—2011 c 263.

This act may be known and cited as the underground utility damage prevention act.

[ 2011 c 263 s 25.]

NOTES:

Report—Effective date—2011 c 263: See notes following RCW 19.122.010.